src/fst/test/gt-desc-yamls/V-totungkve_gt-desc.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-desc.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-desc.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-desc.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-desc.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:



# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct.
# (2007: 47)

  Verb - тотуӈкве: # Verb 'translate_me' - full paradigm
# perhaps stem should be in тотуӈкве+V+Ind+Prs+ScSg3: тоты
    тотуӈкве+V+Inf: тотуӈкве

#    тотнуве: [тотнуве]
#    тотымэн: [тотымэн]

    тотуӈкве+V+Ind+Prs+ScPl1: [тотэ̄в, тотэв]
    тотуӈкве+V+Ind+Prs+ScPl2: [тотэ̄гын, тотэгын]
    тотуӈкве+V+Ind+Prs+ScPl3: [тотэ̄гыт, тотэгыт]
    тотуӈкве+V+Ind+Prs+ScDu1: тотыме̄н
    тотуӈкве+V+Ind+Prs+ScDu2: [тотэ̄гын, тотэгын]
    тотуӈкве+V+Ind+Prs+ScDu3: [тотэ̄г, тотэг]
    тотуӈкве+V+Ind+Prs+ScSg1: [тотэ̄гум, тотэгум]
    тотуӈкве+V+Ind+Prs+ScSg2: [тотэ̄гын, тотэгын]
    тотуӈкве+V+Ind+Prs+ScSg3: тоты


    тотуӈкве+V+Ind+Prt+ScSg1: тотсум
    тотуӈкве+V+Ind+Prt+ScSg2: тотсын
    тотуӈкве+V+Ind+Prt+ScSg3: тотыс
    тотуӈкве+V+Ind+Prt+ScDu1: тотсуме̄н
    тотуӈкве+V+Ind+Prt+ScDu2: [тотсы̄н, тотсын]
    тотуӈкве+V+Ind+Prt+ScDu3: [тотсы̄г, тотсыг]
    тотуӈкве+V+Ind+Prt+ScPl1: тотсув
    тотуӈкве+V+Ind+Prt+ScPl2: [тотсы̄н, тотсын]
    тотуӈкве+V+Ind+Prt+ScPl3: тотсыт

    тотуӈкве+V+Cond+Prs+ScSg1: [тотнувум]
    тотуӈкве+V+Cond+Prs+ScSg2: [тотнувын]
    тотуӈкве+V+Cond+Prs+ScSg3: [тотнув]
    тотуӈкве+V+Cond+Prs+ScDu1: [тотнувамен]
    тотуӈкве+V+Cond+Prs+ScDu2: [тотнувын]
    тотуӈкве+V+Cond+Prs+ScDu3: [тотнувыг]
    тотуӈкве+V+Cond+Prs+ScPl1: [тотнувув]
    тотуӈкве+V+Cond+Prs+ScPl2: [тотнувын]
    тотуӈкве+V+Cond+Prs+ScPl3: [тотнувыт]



    тотуӈкве+V+Imprt+ScDu2: [тотэн]
    тотуӈкве+V+Imprt+ScPl2: [тотэн]
    тотуӈкве+V+Imprt+ScSg2: [тотэн]


    тотуӈкве+V+Ind+Prs+ScSg1+OcSg3: тотылум
    тотуӈкве+V+Ind+Prs+ScSg2+OcSg3: [тотылын]
    тотуӈкве+V+Ind+Prs+ScSg3+OcSg3: [тотытэ]
#    тотуӈкве+V+Ind+Prs+ScDu1+OcSg3: x
    тотуӈкве+V+Ind+Prs+ScDu2+OcSg3: [тотылын]
    тотуӈкве+V+Ind+Prs+ScDu3+OcSg3: [тотытэн]
    тотуӈкве+V+Ind+Prs+ScPl1+OcSg3: [тотылув]
    тотуӈкве+V+Ind+Prs+ScPl2+OcSg3: [тотылын]
    тотуӈкве+V+Ind+Prs+ScPl3+OcSg3: [тотыяныл]

    тотуӈкве+V+Ind+Prs+ScSg1+OcDu3: [тотыягум]
    тотуӈкве+V+Ind+Prs+ScSg2+OcDu3: [тотыягын]
    тотуӈкве+V+Ind+Prs+ScSg3+OcDu3: [тотыяге]
    тотуӈкве+V+Ind+Prs+ScDu1+OcDu3: [тотыягмен]
    тотуӈкве+V+Ind+Prs+ScDu2+OcDu3: [тотыягын]
    тотуӈкве+V+Ind+Prs+ScDu3+OcDu3: [тотыяген]
    тотуӈкве+V+Ind+Prs+ScPl1+OcDu3: [тотыягув]
    тотуӈкве+V+Ind+Prs+ScPl2+OcDu3: [тотыягын]
    тотуӈкве+V+Ind+Prs+ScPl3+OcDu3: [тотыяганыл]

    тотуӈкве+V+Ind+Prs+ScSg1+OcPl3: [тотыянум]
    тотуӈкве+V+Ind+Prs+ScSg2+OcPl3: [тотыян]
    тотуӈкве+V+Ind+Prs+ScSg3+OcPl3: [тотыянэ]
#    тотуӈкве+V+Ind+Prs+ScDu1+OcPl3: xxx
#    тотуӈкве+V+Ind+Prs+ScDu2+OcPl3: xxx
    тотуӈкве+V+Ind+Prs+ScDu3+OcPl3: [тотыянэн]
    тотуӈкве+V+Ind+Prs+ScPl1+OcPl3: [тотыянув]
#    тотуӈкве+V+Ind+Prs+ScPl2+OcPl3: x
    тотуӈкве+V+Ind+Prs+ScPl3+OcPl3: [тотыяныл]

    тотуӈкве+V+Ind+Prt+ScSg1+OcSg3: [тотыслум]
    тотуӈкве+V+Ind+Prt+ScSg2+OcSg3: [тотыслын]
    тотуӈкве+V+Ind+Prt+ScSg3+OcSg3: [тотыстэ]
    тотуӈкве+V+Ind+Prt+ScDu1+OcSg3: [тотысламен]
    тотуӈкве+V+Ind+Prt+ScDu2+OcSg3: [тотыслын]
    тотуӈкве+V+Ind+Prt+ScDu3+OcSg3: [тотыстэн]
    тотуӈкве+V+Ind+Prt+ScPl1+OcSg3: [тотыслув]
    тотуӈкве+V+Ind+Prt+ScPl2+OcSg3: [тотыслын]
    тотуӈкве+V+Ind+Prt+ScPl3+OcSg3: [тотсаныл]


    тотуӈкве+V+Ind+Prt+ScSg1+OcDu3: [тотсагум]
    тотуӈкве+V+Ind+Prt+ScSg2+OcDu3: [тотсагын]
    тотуӈкве+V+Ind+Prt+ScSg3+OcDu3: [тотсаге]
    тотуӈкве+V+Ind+Prt+ScDu1+OcDu3: [тотсагмен]
    тотуӈкве+V+Ind+Prt+ScDu2+OcDu3: [тотсагын]
    тотуӈкве+V+Ind+Prt+ScDu3+OcDu3: [тотсаген]
    тотуӈкве+V+Ind+Prt+ScPl1+OcDu3: [тотсагув]
    тотуӈкве+V+Ind+Prt+ScPl2+OcDu3: [тотсагын]
    тотуӈкве+V+Ind+Prt+ScPl3+OcDu3: [тотсаныл, тотсаганыл]

    тотуӈкве+V+Ind+Prt+ScSg1+OcPl3: [тотсанум]
    тотуӈкве+V+Ind+Prt+ScSg2+OcPl3: [тотсан]
    тотуӈкве+V+Ind+Prt+ScSg3+OcPl3: [тотсанэ]
#    тотуӈкве+V+Ind+Prt+ScDu1+OcPl3: x
#    тотуӈкве+V+Ind+Prt+ScDu2+OcPl3: x
    тотуӈкве+V+Ind+Prt+ScDu3+OcPl3: [тотсанэн]
    тотуӈкве+V+Ind+Prt+ScPl1+OcPl3: [тотсанув]
#    тотуӈкве+V+Ind+Prt+ScPl2+OcPl3: x
    тотуӈкве+V+Ind+Prt+ScPl3+OcPl3: [тотсаныл]




    
    тотуӈкве+V+Cond+Prs+ScSg1+OcSg3: [тотнувлум]
    тотуӈкве+V+Cond+Prs+ScSg2+OcSg3: [тотнувлын]
    тотуӈкве+V+Cond+Prs+ScSg3+OcSg3: [тотнувтэ]
    тотуӈкве+V+Cond+Prs+ScDu1+OcSg3: [тотнувламен]
    тотуӈкве+V+Cond+Prs+ScDu2+OcSg3: [тотнувлын]
#    тотуӈкве+V+Cond+Prs+ScDu3+OcSg3: x
    тотуӈкве+V+Cond+Prs+ScPl1+OcSg3: [тотнувлув]
    тотуӈкве+V+Cond+Prs+ScPl2+OcSg3: [тотнувлын]
    тотуӈкве+V+Cond+Prs+ScPl3+OcSg3: [тотнуваныл]

    тотуӈкве+V+Cond+Prs+ScSg1+OcDu3: [тотнувагум]
    тотуӈкве+V+Cond+Prs+ScSg2+OcDu3: [тотнувагын]
    тотуӈкве+V+Cond+Prs+ScSg3+OcDu3: [тотнуваге]
    тотуӈкве+V+Cond+Prs+ScDu1+OcDu3: [тотнувагмен]
    тотуӈкве+V+Cond+Prs+ScDu2+OcDu3: [тотнувагын]
    тотуӈкве+V+Cond+Prs+ScDu3+OcDu3: [тотнуваген]
#    тотуӈкве+V+Cond+Prs+ScPl1+OcDu3: x
    тотуӈкве+V+Cond+Prs+ScPl2+OcDu3: [тотнувагын]
#    тотуӈкве+V+Cond+Prs+ScPl3+OcDu3: x

    тотуӈкве+V+Cond+Prs+ScSg1+OcPl3: [тотнуванум]
    тотуӈкве+V+Cond+Prs+ScSg2+OcPl3: [тотнуванын]
    тотуӈкве+V+Cond+Prs+ScSg3+OcPl3: [тотнуванэ]
    тотуӈкве+V+Cond+Prs+ScDu1+OcPl3: [тотнуванмен]
    тотуӈкве+V+Cond+Prs+ScDu2+OcPl3: [тотнуванын]
    тотуӈкве+V+Cond+Prs+ScDu3+OcPl3: [тотнуванэн]
    тотуӈкве+V+Cond+Prs+ScPl1+OcPl3: [тотнуванув]
    тотуӈкве+V+Cond+Prs+ScPl2+OcPl3: [тотнуванын]
    тотуӈкве+V+Cond+Prs+ScPl3+OcPl3: [тотнуваныл]



    тотуӈкве+V+Imprt+ScSg2+OcSg3: [тотэлн]
    тотуӈкве+V+Imprt+ScDu2+OcSg3: [тотэлн]
    тотуӈкве+V+Imprt+ScPl2+OcSg3: [тотэлн]

    тотуӈкве+V+Imprt+ScSg2+OcDu3: [тотэгын]
    тотуӈкве+V+Imprt+ScDu2+OcDu3: [тотэгын]
    тотуӈкве+V+Imprt+ScPl2+OcDu3: [тотэгын]

    тотуӈкве+V+Imprt+ScSg2+OcPl3: [тотэн]
    тотуӈкве+V+Imprt+ScDu2+OcPl3: [тотэн]
    тотуӈкве+V+Imprt+ScPl2+OcPl3: [тотэн]








    тотуӈкве+V+Pass+Prs+ScSg1: [тотавем]
    тотуӈкве+V+Pass+Prs+ScSg2: [тотавен]
    тотуӈкве+V+Pass+Prs+ScSg3: [тотаве]
    тотуӈкве+V+Pass+Prs+ScDu1: [тотавемен]
    тотуӈкве+V+Pass+Prs+ScDu2: [тотавен]
    тотуӈкве+V+Pass+Prs+ScDu3: [тотавег]
    тотуӈкве+V+Pass+Prs+ScPl1: [тотавев]
    тотуӈкве+V+Pass+Prs+ScPl2: [тотавен]
    тотуӈкве+V+Pass+Prs+ScPl3: [тотавет]


    тотуӈкве+V+Pass+Prt+ScSg1: [тотвесум]
    тотуӈкве+V+Pass+Prt+ScSg2: [тотвесын]
    тотуӈкве+V+Pass+Prt+ScSg3: [тотвес]
#    тотуӈкве+V+Pass+Prt+ScDu1: x
    тотуӈкве+V+Pass+Prt+ScDu2: [тотвесын]
    тотуӈкве+V+Pass+Prt+ScDu3: [тотвесыг]
    тотуӈкве+V+Pass+Prt+ScPl1: [тотвесув]
    тотуӈкве+V+Pass+Prt+ScPl2: [тотвесын]
    тотуӈкве+V+Pass+Prt+ScPl3: [тотвесыт]

#    тотнувев: [тотнувев]
#    тотнувем: [тотнувем]
#    тотнувен: [тотнувен]
#    тотнувет: [тотнувет]
#    тотыянул: [тотыянул]
#
#
#    тотнувлэн: [тотнувлэн]
#    тотсуме̄н: [тотсуме̄н]
#    тотылумен: [тотылумен]
#    тотвесемен: [тотвесемен]
#    тотсанамен: [тотсанамен]
#    тотыянамен: [тотыянамен]
